Hawaii statutes.
PART III.
SAFE FAMILY HOME FACTORS AND

PRE-PETITION
PROCEDURES

[§587A-7] Safe family home factors.
(a) The following factors shall be fully considered when determining whether a
child's family is willing and able to provide the child with a safe family
home:

(1) Facts relating to the child's current situation,
which shall include:

(A) The child's age, vulnerability, and
special needs that affect the child's attachment, growth, and development;

(B) The child's developmental, psychological,
medical, and dental health status and needs, including the names of assessment
and treatment providers;

(C) The child's peer and family relationships
and bonding abilities;

(D) The child's educational status and
setting, and the department's efforts to maintain educational stability for the
child in out-of-home placement;

(E) The child's living situation;

(F) The child's fear of being in the family
home;

(G) The impact of out-of-home placement on
the child;

(H) Services provided to the child and family;
and

(I) The department's efforts to maintain
connections between the child and the child's siblings, if they are living in
different homes;

(2) The initial and any subsequent reports of harm
and threatened harm to the child;

(3) Dates and reasons for the child's out-of-home
placement; description, appropriateness, and location of the placement; and who
has placement responsibility;

(4) Facts regarding the alleged perpetrators of harm
to the child, the child's parents, and other family members who are parties to
the court proceedings, which facts shall include:

(A) Birthplace and family of origin;

(B) Manner in which the alleged perpetrator
of harm was parented;

(C) Marital and relationship history; and

(D) Prior involvement in services;

(5) Results of psychiatric, psychological, or
developmental evaluations of the child, the alleged perpetrators, and other
family members who are parties;

(6) Whether there is a history of abusive or
assaultive conduct by the child's family members and others who have access to
the family home;

(7) Whether there is a history of substance abuse by
the child's family or others who have access to the family home;

(8) Whether any alleged perpetrator has completed
services in relation to any history identified in paragraphs (6) and (7), and
acknowledged and accepted responsibility for the harm to the child;

(9) Whether any non-perpetrator who resides in the
family home has demonstrated an ability to protect the child from further harm
and to ensure that any current protective orders are enforced;

(10) Whether there is a support system available to
the child's family, including adoptive and hanai relatives, friends, and
faith-based or other community networks;

(11) Attempts to locate and involve extended family,
friends, and faith-based or other community networks;

(12) Whether the child's family has demonstrated an
understanding of and involvement in services that have been recommended by the
department or court-ordered as necessary to provide a safe family home for the
child;

(13) Whether the child's family has resolved
identified safety issues in the family home within a reasonable period of time;
and

(14) The department's assessment, which shall include
the demonstrated ability of the child's family to provide a safe family home
for the child, and recommendations.

(b) The court shall consider the likelihood
that the current situation presented in the safe family home factors set forth
in subsection (a) will continue in the reasonably foreseeable future. [L 2010,
c 135, pt of §1]

Case Notes

Sections 587A-2 and 587A-10 and this section do not contain
an explicit or mandatory preference in favor of relative placements at all
stages of a case. 130 H. 486 (App.), 312 P.3d 1193 (2013).

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next